Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-194
Documents; signature and seal requirements.

The director of the Nebraska Brand Committee or the chairperson of the brand committee shall have the authority to sign all certificates and other documents that may by law require certification by signature. Such documents shall include, but not be limited to, new brand certificates, brand transfer certificates, duplicate brand certificates, and brand renewal receipts. A facsimile of the brand committee seal and the signature of the brand recorder shall also be placed on all brand certificates.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 25;

Laws 2007, LB422, § 3.